Utah statutes.
10-7-3.   Participation in and cooperation with local health department --
Adoption of ordinances.
Each municipality shall participate in and cooperate with the local health
department operating in the county in which the municipality is located.  The
municipality shall cooperate with the board of health of the local health
department in the adoption of ordinances necessary  for the protection of
public health.
